Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 39 Closed Blocks of Business

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1989, chs. 74 and 278, also each enacted a chapter 39 of this title, but they were renumbered as chapters 41 and 40, respectively.

Laws 1991, ch. 193, § 1 also enacted a chapter 39 of title 26, which has been renumbered as chapter 44.

§ 26-39-101.
Scope.

This chapter shall apply to any insurer who has marketed or sold or will market and sell any individual, group or blanket disability insurance contracts to Wyoming residents.

For the purposes of this chapter disability insurance does not include credit disability insurance as defined in W.S. 26-21-102(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 246, § 1.

§ 26-39-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Block of business” means all those individual, group or blanket disability insurance contracts issued by an insurance company under a particular policy form approved by the Wyoming insurance department;

“Closed block of business” means a block of business where an insurer ceases to market or sell in Wyoming any new individual, group or blanket disability insurance contracts under a particular policy form and no new contracts are being added to the block;

“Policy form” means a representative insurance contract which has been filed by an insurer for approval by the Wyoming insurance department pursuant to W.S.

26-15-110

so that other contracts with identical language to that of the policy form may be marketed and sold in Wyoming;

“This act” means W.S.

26-39-101

through

26-39-104

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 246, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-39-103.
Spreading of risk.

If any insurer closes a block of business in this state, the insurer shall spread the claims experience of the closed block of business to, for like insureds without regard to individual health problems, other blocks of business still being marketed and sold by that insurer in this state when determining what premiums are to be charged for the contracts included in the closed block of business.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 246, § 1.

§ 26-39-104.
Violations.

Any insurer who violates any provisions of this chapter is subject to denial, suspension or revocation of its certificate of authority as well as the imposition of a penalty as set forth in W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 246, § 1.